Washington statutes.
RCW 44.20.080

Private publication restricted.

It shall be unlawful for any person to print and publish for sale the session laws of any session in book form within one year after the adjournment of such session, other than those ordered printed by the statute law committee, or to deliver to anyone other than such committee or upon their order any of the session laws so ordered printed by them: PROVIDED, This section shall not apply to any general compilation of the laws of this state or to a compilation of any special laws or laws on any special subject.

[ 1969 c 6 s 6; 1907 c 136 s 6; RRS s 8201.]